Massachusetts, session 194th, H4115.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 2JJJJJJ the following section:- 
Section 2KKKKKK. (a) There shall be established and set up on the books of the 
commonwealth a separate fund known as the Immigrant Legal Assistance Fund, hereinafter 
referred to as the fund. The fund shall award funding to organizations who represent and provide 
legal counsel to undocumented immigrants in a court of law. The fund shall be administered by 
the Massachusetts Legal Assistance Corporation. 
(b) The fund shall be credited with: (i) revenue from appropriations or other money 
authorized by the general court and specifically designated to be credited to the fund; (ii) interest 
earned on money in the fund; (iii) contributions from private sector entities, including local 
immigration agencies or non-profits, foundations and other organizations; and (iv) federal grants 
and other gifts, grants and donations for the support of legal representation for undocumented 

of 2 13 immigrants. Amounts credited to the fund shall not be subject to further appropriation and any 
money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund. 
(c) The Massachusetts Legal Assistance Corporation shall annually, not later than 
December 31, report on the activity of the fund to the: (i) chairs of the joint committee on the 
judiciary; (ii) chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means; and (iii) clerks of 
the house of representatives and senate. 
SECTION 2. Chapter 276 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the 
following section:- 
Section 104. All law enforcement officers of local and state law enforcement agencies 
shall not contact or share information with federal authorities, including federal immigration 
authorities, regarding any person's immigration status. Law enforcement officers or law 
enforcement agencies may share such information with federal authorities only when verified 
through the commonwealth’s criminal offender record information database established in 
section 172 of chapter 6 that the individual has a documented criminal conviction. All law 
enforcement officers or law enforcement agencies communications with federal authorities shall 
follow departmental protocols and be authorized by a supervising officer who shall document the 
basis for sharing the individual’s information.